Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.420

Governor's proclamation calling convention—Publication.

The proclamation shall be published once each week for two successive weeks in one newspaper published and of general circulation in each of the congressional districts of the state. The first publication of the proclamation shall be within thirty days of the receipt of official notice by the state of the submission of the amendment.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1431. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.74.020; prior: 1933 c 181 s 1, part; RRS s 5249-1, part. Formerly RCW 29.74.020.]